apertium-ara-heb.heb.dix
    <pardef n="אגרונו/ם__n_f_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r></r></p><par n="ד/ם__n_m"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מית</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__שק"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מית</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p><par n="S__שק"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיות</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__שק"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיות</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p><par n="S__שק"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="מומח/ה__n_f_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r></r></p><par n="קנ/ה__n_m"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ית</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__שק"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ית</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p><par n="S__שק"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יות</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__שק"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יות</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p><par n="S__שק"/></e>
    </pardef>
<!-- end pardefs to check whether S__שק works TODO -->

    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <pardef n="מריה__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="מיכאל__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="בבל__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="רובנישטיין__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="סין__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="לינוקס__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="אירוויזיון__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ידיעות__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->
    <pardef n="איך__adv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="לא__adv" c="only used for 'not'">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="עכשיו__adv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    
    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->
    
    <pardef n="שמי__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ת</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ים</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ות</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="זר__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ה</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ים</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ות</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="שיי/ך__adj">
      <e><p><l>ך</l><r>ך<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>כת</l><r>ך<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>כים</l><r>ך<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>כות</l><r>ך<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="אלי/ם__adj">
      <e><p><l>ם</l><r>ם<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>מה</l><r>ם<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>מים</l><r>ם<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>מות</l><r>ם<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="זהה__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ים</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ות</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="מפורס/ם__adj">
      <e><p><l>ם</l><r>ם<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>מת</l><r>ם<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>מים</l><r>ם<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>מות</l><r>ם<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="נטע/ן__adj">
      <e><p><l>ן</l><r>ן<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>נת</l><r>ן<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>נים</l><r>ן<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>נות</l><r>ן<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
    <pardef n="קט/ן__adj">
      <e><p><l>ן</l><r>ן<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>נה</l><r>ן<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>נים</l><r>ן<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>נות</l><r>ן<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="אגרונום"><par n="ה"/><i>אגרונו</i><par n="אגרונו/ם__n_f_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מומחה"><par n="ה"/><i>מומח</i><par n="מומח/ה__n_f_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אסטרונום"><par n="ה"/><i>אסטרונו</i><par n="אגרונו/ם__n_f_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אוסטריה"><i>אוסטריה</i><par n="סין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="יוון"><i>יוון</i><par n="סין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ספרד"><i>ספרד</i><par n="סין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="מנצ'סטר"><i>מנצ'סטר</i><par n="סין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="אוודש"><i>אוודש</i><par n="סין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="בוג'יבה"><i>בוג'יבה</i><par n="סין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="וותיקן"><i>וותיקן</i><par n="סין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="טא' קרצ'ם"><i>טא'<b/>קרצ'ם</i><par n="סין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="מוסטה"><i>מוסטה</i><par n="סין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="סוויאי"><i>סוויאי</i><par n="סין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="סנטה ליברטה"><i>סנטה<b/>ליברטה</i><par n="סין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="רומא"><i>רומא</i><par n="סין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="אייר"><i>אייר</i><par n="רובנישטיין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="בבל"><i>בבל</i><par n="בבל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="בוניצ'י"><i>בוניצ'י</i><par n="רובנישטיין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="במבינה"><i>במבינה</i><par n="רובנישטיין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ברסיאנו"><i>ברסיאנו</i><par n="רובנישטיין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ברקלי"><i>ברקלי</i><par n="בבל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="גיינסבורג"><i>גיינסבורג</i><par n="רובנישטיין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="דיקנס"><i>דיקנס</i><par n="רובנישטיין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="הוקני"><i>הוקני</i><par n="רובנישטיין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ורונסי"><i>ורונסי</i><par n="רובנישטיין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="מיל"><i>מיל</i><par n="רובנישטיין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="סהא"><i>סהא</i><par n="רובנישטיין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="פרוג'ה"><i>פרוג'ה</i><par n="רובנישטיין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="קראצ'י"><i>קראצ'י</i><par n="רובנישטיין__np"/></e>
    <e lm="אוליבר"><i>אוליבר</i><par n="מיכאל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="אלכס"><i>אלכס</i><par n="מיכאל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="אפריים"><i>אפריים</i><par n="מיכאל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ג'וזף"><i>ג'וזף</i><par n="מיכאל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ג'יובאני"><i>ג'יובאני</i><par n="מיכאל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="גרגור"><i>גרגור</i><par n="מיכאל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="טוניו"><i>טוניו</i><par n="מיכאל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="מוריס"><i>מוריס</i><par n="מיכאל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="נוויל"><i>נוויל</i><par n="מיכאל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="עמונאל"><i>עמונאל</i><par n="מיכאל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="קאליסטו"><i>קאליסטו</i><par n="מיכאל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ריימונד"><i>ריימונד</i><par n="מיכאל__np"/></e>
    <e lm="אווה"><i>אווה</i><par n="מריה__np"/></e>
    <e lm="אנה"><i>אנה</i><par n="מריה__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ברברה"><i>ברברה</i><par n="מריה__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ג'וליה"><i>ג'וליה</i><par n="מריה__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ג'ני"><i>ג'ני</i><par n="מריה__np"/></e>
    <e lm="טס"><i>טס</i><par n="מריה__np"/></e>
    <e lm="מדונה"><i>מדונה</i><par n="מריה__np"/></e>
	<e lm="מריה"><i>מריה</i><par n="מריה__np"/></e>
    <e lm="סופי"><i>סופי</i><par n="מריה__np"/></e>
    <e lm="פפי"><i>פפי</i><par n="מריה__np"/></e>
    <e lm="קלודט"><i>קלודט</i><par n="מריה__np"/></e>
    <e lm="רות"><i>רות</i><par n="מריה__np"/></e>
    <e lm="אירוויזיון"><i>אירוויזיון</i><par n="אירוויזיון__np"/></e>
    <e lm="פייסבוק"><i>פייסבוק</i><par n="אירוויזיון__np"/></e>
    <e lm="צבא מלטה"><i>צבא<b/>מלטה</i><par n="אירוויזיון__np"/></e>
    <e lm="דברי מלטה"><i>דברי<b/>מלטה</i><par n="ידיעות__np"/></e>
    <e lm="אולימפיאדה"><i>אולימפיאדה</i><par n="לינוקס__np"/></e>
    <e lm="אייר מלטה"><i>אייר<b/>מלטה</i><par n="לינוקס__np"/></e>
    <e lm="גוגל"><i>גוגל</i><par n="לינוקס__np"/></e>
    <e lm="המפלגה הירוקה"><i>המפלגה<b/>הירוקה</i><par n="לינוקס__np"/></e>
    <e lm="וויקיפדיה"><i>וויקיפדיה</i><par n="לינוקס__np"/></e>
    <e lm=""><i>"יוזמת<b/>"שותפות<b/>לשלום""</i><par n="לינוקס__np"/></e>
    <e lm="יונייטד"><i>יונייטד</i><par n="לינוקס__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ליגת האלופות"><i>ליגת<b/>האלופות</i><par n="לינוקס__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ליגת העל"><i>ליגת<b/>העל</i><par n="לינוקס__np"/></e>
    <e lm="לינוקס"><i>לינוקס</i><par n="לינוקס__np"/></e>
    <e lm="מפלגת האלטרנטיבה הדמוקרטית"><i>מפלגת<b/>האלטרנטיבה<b/>הדמוקרטית</i><par n="לינוקס__np"/></e>
    <e lm="מפלגת העבודה"><i>מפלגת<b/>העבודה</i><par n="לינוקס__np"/></e>
    <e lm="בריטי"><i>בריטי</i><par n="שמי__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="בסיסי"><i>בסיסי</i><par n="שמי__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="אנדמי"><i>אנדמי</i><par n="שמי__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="קלאסי"><i>קלאסי</i><par n="שמי__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="רומנטי"><i>רומנטי</i><par n="שמי__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="דרמטי"><i>דרמטי</i><par n="שמי__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="משפטי"><i>משפטי</i><par n="שמי__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="מעשי"><i>מעשי</i><par n="שמי__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="טראגי"><i>טראגי</i><par n="שמי__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="מפוקפק"><i>מפוקפק</i><par n="שמי__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="רע"><i>רע</i><par n="זר__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="אדיב"><i>אדיב</i><par n="זר__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="זר"><i>זר</i><par n="זר__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="נחמד"><i>נחמד</i><par n="זר__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="קר"><i>קר</i><par n="זר__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="גדול"><i>גדול</i><par n="זר__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="שמח"><i>שמח</i><par n="זר__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="אלים"><i>אלי</i><par n="אלי/ם__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="זהה"><i>זהה</i><par n="זהה__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="פורה"><i>פורה</i><par n="זהה__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="מפורסם"><i>מפורס</i><par n="מפורס/ם__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="נטען"><i>נטע</i><par n="נטע/ן__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="קטן"><i>קט</i><par n="קט/ן__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="חם"><i>ח</i><par n="אלי/ם__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="שייך"><i>שיי</i><par n="שיי/ך__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="גאלי"><i>גאלי</i><par n="שמי__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="לא" c="not"><i>לא</i><par n="לא__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="איך" c="how"><i>איך</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="עם מה" c="with what"><i>עם<b/>מה</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="למה" c="why"><i>למה</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="מדוע" c="why"><i>מדוע</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="האמנם" c="can it be"><i>האמנם</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="במקרה" c="by any chance"><i>במקרה</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="מאיפה" c="from where"><i>מאיפה</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="עד לאן" c="till where"><i>עד<b/>לאן</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="לאן" c="to where"><i>לאן</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="באיזו זכות" c="by what right"><i>באיזו<b/>זכות</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="איפה"><i>איפה</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="היכן"><i>היכן</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="אחורה"><i>אחורה</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="באופן בינלאומי"><i>באופן<b/>בינלאומי</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="במקום"><i>במקום</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="בקרוב"><i>בקרוב</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="פנימה"><i>פנימה</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="יותר"><i>יותר</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="כן"><i>כן</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ליתר דיוק"><i>ליתר<b/>דיוק</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="לפעמים"><i>לפעמים</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="מילולית"><i>מילולית</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="מאוד"><i>מאוד</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
